Hawaii statutes.
B.
Curriculum and Instruction

§302A-251 School year; student hours. (a)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, beginning with the 2011-2013
school years, all public schools, excluding charter schools and multi-track
public schools, shall implement a school year of one hundred eighty days,
excluding professional development days and other non-instructional days
negotiated pursuant to chapter 89.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary:

(1) For the 2011-2012 school year, fifty per cent of
all public elementary schools in the State, excluding charter schools and
multi-track public schools, shall implement a school year that includes nine
hundred fifteen student hours; and

(2) Beginning with the 2012-2013 school year, all
public elementary schools in the State, excluding charter schools and
multi-track public schools, shall implement a school year that includes nine
hundred fifteen student hours.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, for the 2015-2016 school year, all public secondary schools,
excluding charter schools and multi-track public schools, shall implement a
school year that includes nine hundred ninety student hours.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, beginning with the 2016-2017 school year, all public schools,
excluding charter schools and multi-track public schools, shall implement a
school year of one hundred eighty days, excluding professional development days
and other non-instructional days negotiated pursuant to chapter 89, that shall
include one thousand eighty student hours for both elementary and secondary
school grades.

(e) The board, in its discretion, may grant a
waiver to any individual school subject to the student hours or one hundred
eighty day school year requirements in this section. The board shall adopt
policies and procedures to grant a waiver under this subsection.

(f) For purposes of this section,
"student shall be inclusive of the full school day in alignment with the
State's general learner outcomes.

(g) The department of education, with the
board of education and office of the governor, and in consultation with
representatives of the affected collective bargaining units, shall submit to
the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular
sessions of 2013, 2014, 2015, and 2016, a report on its progress and efforts to
meet the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d). [L 2010, c 167, §3;
am L 2011, c 52, §1; am L 2015, c 21, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next